Utah statutes.
58-54-306.   Exemption from licensure.

A person may engage in the practice of radiologic technology without being licensed under this chapter if:

(1) (a)  the person is filling a new or existing position as an employee performing the duties of a radiology practical technician when a licensed radiology practical technician is not available to begin in the new position or continue filling the existing position;

(b)  the total period in which the position is filled by the unlicensed person is not more than 90 days;

(c)  the unlicensed person at all times performs services as a radiology practical technician under the direct on-premises supervision of a radiology practitioner; and

(d)  the employee position filled by an unlicensed person under this section is an existing position and was filled by a person licensed under this chapter immediately prior to employment of the unlicensed person;

(2)  the person:

(a)  performs services in a dental facility under the supervision of a dentist licensed to practice in this state; and

(b)  has completed a radiology course approved by the Dentists and Dental Hygienists Board created under Section 58-69-201; or

(3)  the person:

(a)  performs services in a medical facility under the supervision of a podiatric physician licensed to practice in this state; and

(b)  has completed a radiology course approved by the Podiatric Physician Board created under Section 58-5a-201.

